Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.200

Norm-referenced assessments—Diagnostic assessments.

(1) The legislature intends to permit school districts to offer norm-referenced assessments, make diagnostic tools available to school districts, and provide funding for diagnostic assessments to enhance student learning at all grade levels and provide early intervention before the high school statewide student assessment.

(2) In addition to the diagnostic assessments provided under this section, school districts may, at their own expense, administer norm-referenced assessments to students.

(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall post on its website for voluntary use by school districts, a guide of diagnostic assessments. The assessments in the guide, to the extent possible, shall include the characteristics listed in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose, beginning September 1, 2007, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make diagnostic assessments in reading, writing, mathematics, and science in elementary, middle, and high school grades available to school districts. Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall also provide funding to school districts for administration of diagnostic assessments to help improve student learning, identify academic weaknesses, enhance student planning and guidance, and develop targeted instructional strategies to assist students before the high school statewide student assessment. To the greatest extent possible, the assessments shall be:

(a) Aligned to the state's grade level expectations;

(b) Individualized to each student's performance level;

(c) Administered efficiently to provide results either immediately or within two weeks;

(d) Capable of measuring individual student growth over time and allowing student progress to be compared to other students across the country;

(e) Readily available to parents; and

(f) Cost-effective.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offer training at statewide and regional staff development activities in:

(a) The interpretation of diagnostic assessments; and

(b) Application of instructional strategies that will increase student learning based on diagnostic assessment data.

[ 2019 c 252 s 121; 2009 c 539 s 1; 2007 c 354 s 8; 2006 c 117 s 4; 2005 c 217 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.

Effective date—2009 c 539: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 539 s 7.]

Findings—Intent—2007 c 354: See note following RCW 28A.655.070.

Intent—2006 c 117: See note following RCW 28A.600.045.